Utah statutes.
15-8-10.   Renegotiations and extensions.
(1)  A renegotiation shall occur when an existing rental purchase agreement is
satisfied and replaced by a new agreement entered into by the same lessor and
consumer. A renegotiation shall be considered a new agreement requiring new
disclosures. However, events such as the following may not be treated as
renegotiations:
(a)  the addition or return of property in a multiple item agreement or the
substitution of the rental property, if in either case the previous periodic
payment allocable to a rental period does not change by more than 25%;
(b)  a deferral or extension of one or more periodic payments, or any portion
of a periodic payment;
(c)  a reduction in charges in the agreement; or
(d)  any court proceedings involving an agreement.
(2)  Disclosures are not required for any extension of a rental purchase
agreement.
